ani_morph_adverbs.lexd
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ADVERBS
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

PATTERNS
Adverbs[-initial_aggr,-final_aggr] [<ADV>:]
agrCL Adverbs[initial_aggr] [<ADV>:]
Adverbs[final_aggr] agrCL [<ADV>:]
Particles

LEXICON Adverbs
игьолгу[initial_aggr]                                                           # много; a lot of
игьугу[initial_aggr]                                                            # много; many
ехъиссорий[initial_aggr]                                                        # вокруг; around
суни                                                                            # вчера; yesterday
желъал                                                                          # сегодня; today
жегьал                                                                          # сегодня; today
гьикьу                                                                          # внизу; at the bottom
гьикьукку                                                                       # снизу; from the bottom
сседу                                                                           # впереди; in front of
гьонолъу                                                                        # здесь; here
гьолъу                                                                          # здесь; here
сой                                                                             # послезавтра; day after tomorrow
илIохъи                                                                         # медленно; slowly     
илIогва                                                                         # медленно; slowly
элолла                                                                          # далеко; far away
гьину                                                                           # внутри; inside
хехи                                                                            # быстро; quickly
гьуду                                                                           # там; there
щела                                                                            # завтра; tomorrow
иннагуло                                                                        # иногда; sometimes
ссоб                                                                            # в прошлом году; last year
нукIвал                                                                         # давно; long ago
илIи                                                                            # ??как; ??how
инна                                                                            # когда; when
ивалъиболо                                                                      # куда-то; somewhere 
гьиъо                                                                           # наверх; upward
тIулларай                                                                       # назло; to spite (smb)
чомло                                                                           # несколько; several
гьечIодоъо                                                                      # ночью; at night
гьонолъукку                                                                     # отсюда; from here
гьондолъукку                                                                    # оттуда; from there
лIеру                                                                           # поблизости; hereabout
онщило                                                                          # потом; after
учIчIери                                                                        # рано; early
нагвагьи                                                                        # редко; rarely
чIомгъи                                                                         # сколько; how much
илъагъи                                                                         # сколько; how much
ибъало                                                                          # столько; so many
гьоваро                                                                         # сюда; here
гьонокьей                                                                       # так; that way
охходоро                                                                        # утром; in the morning

LEXICON Particles
золо                                                                            # очень; very 
тIулу                                                                           # очень; very
гьуᵸ                                                                            # да; yes
джи                                                                             # да; yes
гьайгьай                                                                        # конечно; certainly
масала                                                                          # например; for example
баркала                                                                         # спасибо; thank you


# и=в=а(-л)?                                                                    # куда
# себгулолъуссу                                                                 # нигде; nowhere
# себгулоссу                                                                    # никто; no one
